Maine, session 132, LD649.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §451, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Chiropractic radiographer. "Chiropractic radiographer" means a licensed
chiropractic assistant who has been issued a certificate pursuant to section 559.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §451, sub-§3-B is enacted to read:
3-B. Chiropractic radiography. "Chiropractic radiography" means the use of
ionizing radiation on human beings for chiropractic diagnostic purposes while under the
supervision and control of a chiropractor in accordance with this chapter.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §555, as amended by PL 1993, c. 600, Pt. A, §52, is further
amended to read:
§555. Assistants
This chapter does not prohibit an individual from rendering ancillary diagnostic or
therapeutic services as used in chiropractic practice, other than the adjustive or
manipulative techniques, if those services are rendered under the supervision and control
of a licensed chiropractor as long as that individual has successfully completed a training
program recognized by the board. "Supervision and control" may not be construed as
requiring the personal presence of the supervising and controlling chiropractor at the place
where those services are rendered, unless physical presence is necessary to provide patient
care of the same quality as provided by the chiropractor. This chapter does not prohibit a
chiropractor from delegating to an employee certain activities relating to the care and
treatment being performed by custom and usage when those activities are under the direct
control of and in the presence of the chiropractor. The chiropractor delegating those
activities to an employee, to a program graduate or to a participant in an approved training
program is legally liable for those activities performed by such an individual, and that
individual is considered to be the chiropractor's agent. A chiropractic assistant may
practice chiropractic radiography as long as the chiropractic assistant has been issued a
certificate as a chiropractic radiographer pursuant to section 559.
Page 1 - 132LR1557(03)

Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §559 is enacted to read:
§559. Chiropractic radiographer certificate
1. Certificate required. In addition to being licensed under section 556, an individual
employed in a chiropractic office whose duties include the production of x-rays and who is
not licensed under subchapter 3 must be certified by the board as a chiropractic
radiographer under this section.
2. Requirements. The requirements for an individual to be certified by the board as
a chiropractic radiographer under this section include that the individual:
A. Possesses a valid license under section 556;
B. Satisfactorily completes a board-approved course in radiologic technology that
satisfies the standards of care governing the production of x-rays, including:
(1) At least 50 hours of instruction; and
(2) Sufficient instruction in:
(a) Physics and equipment of radiographic imaging;
(b) Principles of radiographic exposure;
(c) Radiographic protection;
(d) Anatomy and physiology; and
(e) Radiographic positioning and procedure;
C. Passes a proficiency examination in radiologic technology developed and
administered by or under the authority of the board; and
D. Pays a fee not to exceed $100 under section 558.
A person registered as active with the American Chiropractic Registry of Radiologic
Technologists or a successor organization meets the requirements of paragraphs B and C.
3. Renewal. A certificate issued under this section expires at the end of the calendar
year in which it is issued. A certificate holder may renew the holder's certificate upon:
A. Completion and submission of a renewal application form approved by the board;
B. Completion of board-approved continuing radiologic technology education during
the year; and
C. Payment of a fee not to exceed $100 under section 558.
A certificate may be renewed under this section within 24 months of expiration if the
certificate holder completes the requirements of paragraph B for or attributed to each
calendar year that the certificate was expired and pays the fee required pursuant to
paragraph C. If a certificate has been expired for more than 24 months, the certificate may
be renewed if the certificate holder completes the requirements of paragraph A and
subsection 2, paragraph C and pays the fee required pursuant to paragraph C.
4. Display of certificate. A certificate issued under this section must be displayed in
the area of a chiropractic office where x-ray production is performed by the certificate
holder and in a manner that is viewable by a patient.
Page 2 - 132LR1557(03)

5. Violation. An individual who violates this section, including an individual licensed
under subchapter 3 who allows a violation of this section to occur, is subject to disciplinary
sanctions under section 503-B, subsection 4.
6. Rules. The board shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section,
including the provision of continuing radiologic technology education for the purposes of
subsection 3, paragraph B. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical
rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 5. 32 MRSA §9854, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2023, c. 100, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Exceptions. The requirement of a license does not apply to:
A. A dentist, dental hygienist, expanded function dental assistant or dental
radiographer licensed under chapter 143;
C. A resident physician or a student enrolled in and attending a school or college of
medicine, osteopathy, chiropractic, podiatry, dentistry or radiologic technology or an
individual who is concurrently obtaining the education and clinical training required
by the board by rule who applies ionizing radiation to a human being while under the
supervision of a licensed practitioner;
D. Any person serving in the United States Armed Services or public health service or
employed by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or other federal agency
performing the person's official duties as long as the duties are limited to that service
or employment; or
E. A cardiovascular technologist credentialed by the Commission on Accreditation of
Allied Health Education Programs, Cardiovascular Credentialing International or a
successor organization who is performing the activities permitted under this paragraph
and is acting under the delegated authority and direct supervision of a physician while
the physician is performing cardiac catheterization or electrophysiology procedures.
For the purposes of this paragraph, the activities permitted are limited to procedure
table actions that are necessary during cardiac catheterization or electrophysiology
procedures, including enabling fluoroscopy to start the procedure, changing the field
of view, positioning the image intensifier, adjusting collimation, placing the wedge
filter, panning the procedure table during exposure, stepping on the pedal at the
physician's direction when the physician cannot reach the pedal and performing other
similar actions under the delegated authority and direct supervision of the physician.;
or
F. A chiropractic assistant certified as a chiropractic radiographer pursuant to section
559.
Sec. 6. Exemption from sunrise review. This Act is enacted without review
under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 12015, subsection 3.
Page 3 - 132LR1557(03)